src/morphology/stems/altstem-verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_VASTAILLA
!! € vastailla
0:l    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:l    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:e    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:e    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:e    V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_ÄKSYILLÄ
!! € vastailla
0:l    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:l    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:e    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:e    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:e    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_L    ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0   V_FRONT_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_LEIKELLÄ
!! € leikellä
0:ell    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ell    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:kele    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:kele    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kele    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:kel    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:kel    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:kel    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:el   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:el   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:el   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:el   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:el   V_FRONT_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_NAKELLA
!! € nakella
0:ell    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ell    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:kele    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:kele    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kele    V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:kel    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:kel    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:kel    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:el   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:el   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:el   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:el   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:el   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_TAPELLA
!! € tapella
0:ell    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ell    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:pele    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pele    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pele    V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:pel    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:pel    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:pel    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:el   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:el   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:el   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:el   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:el   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_HYPELLÄ
!! € hypellä
0:ell    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ell    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:pele    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pele    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pele    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:pel    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:pel    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:pel    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:el   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:el   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:el   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:el   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:el   V_FRONT_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_SULATELLA
!! € sulatella
0:ell    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ell    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:el   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:el   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:el   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:el   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:el   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;
 
LEXICON V_HERÄTELLÄ
!! € herätellä
0:ell    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ell    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:el   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:el   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:el   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:el   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:el   V_FRONT_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_TIPAHDELLA
!! € tipahdella
0:dell    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:dell    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:del   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:del   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:del   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:del   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:del   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_SÄPSÄHDELLÄ
!! € säpsähdellä
0:dell    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:dell    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:del   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:del   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:del   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:del   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:del   V_FRONT_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_OMMELLA
!! € ommella
0:mell    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:mell    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:pele    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pele    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pele    V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:pel    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:pel    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:pel    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:mel   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:mel   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:mel   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:mel   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:mel   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_VAELLELLA
!! € vaellella
0:lell    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:lell    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:lel   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:lel   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:lel   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:lel   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:lel   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_KIILLELLÄ
!! € kiillellä
0:lell    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:lell    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:lel   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:lel   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:lel   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:lel   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:lel   V_FRONT_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_KOMENNELLA
!! € komennella
0:nell    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:nell    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:nel   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:nel   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:nel   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:nel   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:nel   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;
 
LEXICON V_KÄÄNNELLÄ
!! € käännellä
0:nell    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:nell    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:nel   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:nel   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:nel   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:nel   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:nel   V_FRONT_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_NAKERRELLA
!! € nakerrella
0:rell    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:rell    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_BACK_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:rel   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:rel   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:rel   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:rel   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:rel   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;
 
LEXICON V_KIHERRELLÄ
!! € kiherrellä
0:rell    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:rell    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tele    V_FRONT_3SG_E ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tel    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:rel   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:rel   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L ;
0:rel   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:rel   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:rel   V_FRONT_TUPCP_L    ;

LEXICON V_ISÄNNÖIDÄ
!! € isännöidä
0:id    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:id    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:i     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:itse     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:i   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:itse   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_FRONT_3SG_I  ;
0:itse   V_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:its   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:its   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:i   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:i   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:i   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:i   V_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_MELLAKOIDA
!! € mellakoida
0:id    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:id    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:i     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:itse     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:i   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:itse   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0   V_BACK_3SG_I  ;
0:itse   V_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:its   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:its   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:i   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:i   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i   V_BACK_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:i   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:i   V_BACK_TUPCP_D  ;


LEXICON V_PALKITA
!! € palkita
0:t     V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:t     V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tse     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tse   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tse   V_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:ts   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ts   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:t   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_MERKITÄ
!! € merkitä
0:t    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:t    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tse     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tse   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tse   V_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:ts   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ts   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_JUOSTA
!! € juosta
0:st     V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:st     V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kse     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kse   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kse   V_BACK_3SG_E  ;
0:ks   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ks   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:s   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:s   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:s   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:s   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:s   V_BACK_TUPCP_STRONG  ;


LEXICON V_PIESTÄ
!! € piestä
0:st    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:st    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kse     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kse   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kse   V_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:ks   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ks   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:s   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:s   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_S  ;
0:s   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:s   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:s   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_NÄHDÄ
!! € nähdä
0:hd   V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:hd   V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:e       V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ke    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ke    V_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:k    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:h   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:h   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:h   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_D    ;
0:h   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:h   V_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;

LEXICON V_KARHETA
!! € karheta
0:t    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:t    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ne     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ne   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:nee   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:n   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:n   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:t   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_VÄHETÄ
!! € karheta
0:t    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:t    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ne     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ne   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:nee   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:n   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:n   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_NIUKETA
!! € niuketa
0:et    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:et    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kene     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kene   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kene   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:ken   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ken   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:et   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_JYRKETÄ
!! € jyrketä
0:et    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:et    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kene     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kene   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kene   V_FRONT_3SG_E          ;
0:ken   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:ken   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_HAPATA
!! € hapata
0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pane     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pane   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pane   V_BACK_3SG_E          ;
0:pan   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pan   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
